Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-414
Districts; change in territory; list of voters; accompany petition.

A list or lists of all the legal voters in each district or territory affected, made under the oath of a resident of each district or territory, shall be given to the State Committee for the Reorganization of School Districts when the petition is filed under section 79-413.

Laws 1883, c. 72, § 1, p. 288;

Laws 1885, c. 79, § 1, p. 319;

Laws 1889, c. 78, § 1, p. 539;

Laws 1895, c. 58, § 1, p. 221;

Laws 1901, c. 59, § 1, p. 429;

Laws 1909, c. 117, § 1, p. 451;

R.S.1913, § 6703;

C.S.1922, § 6241;

Laws 1923, c. 63, § 1, p. 190;

Laws 1925, c. 177, § 1, p. 461;

C.S.1929, § 79-104;

Laws 1931, c. 145, § 1, p. 396;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 79-104;

Laws 1943, c. 197, § 1(5), p. 662;

R.S.1943, § 79-110;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 43, p. 707;

R.R.S.1943, § 79-404;

Laws 1971, LB 468, § 7;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-402.08;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 163;

Laws 1999, LB 272, § 31.